New York, session 2025-2026, S4447.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 355 of the education law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 22 to read as follows: 3 22. Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the 4 state university trustees shall adopt a policy prohibiting the use of 5 dormitories maintained and operated by a state-operated campus of the 6 state university of New York for the purposes of providing permanent or 7 temporary housing for migrant populations. Nothing in this section shall 8 be construed to restrict an enrolled student or member of a campus's 9 faculty or staff from accessing housing in dormitories maintained and 10 operated by a state-operated campus of the state university of New York. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08220-01-5